Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5637.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-49-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-49 entitled "Credit Card
Crime Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-49-4. Fraudulent use of credit cards Fraudulent use of credit or debit cards.
A person who, with intent to defraud the issuer or a person or organization providing
money, goods, services, or anything else of value or any other person, uses, for the purpose of
obtaining money, goods, services, or anything else of value, a credit card or debit card obtained or
retained in violation of this law or a credit card or debit card which he or she knows is forged,
expired, or revoked, or who obtains money, goods, services, or anything else of value by
representing, without the consent of the cardholder, that he or she is the holder of a specified card
or by representing that he or she is the holder of a card and the card has not in fact been issued,
violates this section and is subject to the penalties set forth in § 11-49-10(a), if the value of all
moneys, goods, services, and other things of value obtained in violation of this subsection does not
exceed one hundred dollars ($100) in any six (6) month period. The violator is subject to the
penalties set forth in § 11-49-10(b) if the value does exceed one hundred dollars ($100) in any six
(6) month period. Knowledge of revocation shall be presumed to have been received by a
cardholder four (4) days after it has been mailed to him or her at the address set forth on the credit
card or debit card or at his or her last known address by registered or certified mail, return receipt
requested, and, if the address is more than five hundred (500) miles from the place of mailing, by
air mail. If the address is located outside the United States, Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, the

Canal Zone or Canada, notice shall be presumed to have been received ten (10) days after mailing
by registered or certified mail.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002190
========
LC002190 - Page 2 of 3